Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 2. Limited Partners.

Sec. 32.11.100.
Admission of limited partners.

A person becomes a limited partner

at the time the limited partnership is formed; or

at a later time specified in the records of the limited partnership for becoming a limited partner.

After the filing of a limited partnership’s original certificate of limited partnership, a person may be admitted as an additional limited partner

in the case of a person acquiring a partnership interest directly from the limited partnership, upon compliance with the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not provide, upon the written consent of all partners; and

in the case of an assignee of a partnership interest of a partner who has the power under AS

32.11.350

to grant the assignee the right to become a limited partner, upon the exercise of that power and compliance with conditions limiting the grant or exercise of the power.

History.

(§ 6 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 817 et seq.

Sec. 32.11.110.
Voting.

Subject to AS

32.11.120

, the partnership agreement may grant to all or a specified group of the limited partners the right to vote on a per capita or other basis on any matter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.120.
Liability to third parties.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, a limited partner is not liable for the obligations of a limited partnership unless the limited partner is also a general partner or, in addition to the exercise of the limited partner’s rights and powers as a limited partner, the limited partner participates in the control of the business. However, if the limited partner participates in the control of the business, the limited partner is liable only to persons who transact business with the limited partnership reasonably believing, based upon the limited partner’s conduct, that the limited partner is a general partner.

A limited partner does not participate in the control of the business within the meaning of (a) of this section solely by doing one or more of the following:

being a contractor for or an agent or employee of the limited partnership or of a general partner or being an officer, director, or shareholder of a general partner that is a corporation;

consulting with and advising a general partner with respect to the business of the limited partnership;

acting as surety for the limited partnership or guaranteeing or assuming one or more specific obligations of the limited partnership;

taking any action required or permitted by law to bring or pursue a derivative action in the right of the limited partnership;

requesting or attending a meeting of partners;

proposing, approving, or disapproving, by voting or otherwise, one or more of the following matters:

the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership;

the sale, exchange, lease, mortgage, pledge, or other transfer of all or substantially all of the assets of the limited partnership;

the incurrence of indebtedness by the limited partnership other than in the ordinary course of its business;

a change in the nature of the business;

the admission or removal of a general partner;

the admission or removal of a limited partner;

a transaction involving an actual or potential conflict of interest between a general partner and the limited partnership or the limited partners;

an amendment to the partnership agreement or certificate of limited partnership; or

matters related to the business of the limited partnership not otherwise enumerated in this paragraph that the partnership agreement states in writing may be subject to the approval or disapproval of limited partners;

winding up the limited partnership under AS

32.11.390

; or

exercising a right or power permitted to limited partners under this chapter and not specifically enumerated in this subsection.

The enumeration in (b) of this section does not mean that the possession or exercise of any other powers by a limited partner constitutes participation by the limited partner in the business of the limited partnership.

A limited partner who knowingly permits the limited partner’s name to be used in the name of the limited partnership, except under circumstances permitted by AS

32.11.810(a)(2)

, is liable to creditors who extend credit to the limited partnership without actual knowledge that the limited partner is not a general partner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 31 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 817 et seq.

68 C.J.S., Partnership, §§ 591-601.

Sec. 32.11.130.
Erroneous belief in status as a limited partner.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who makes a contribution to a business enterprise and erroneously but in good faith believes that the person has become a limited partner in the enterprise is not a general partner in the enterprise and is not bound by its obligations by reason of making the contribution, receiving distributions from the enterprise, or exercising the rights of a limited partner, if, on ascertaining the mistake, the person

causes an appropriate certificate of limited partnership or a certificate of amendment to be executed and filed; or

withdraws from future equity participation in the enterprise by executing and filing in the office of the commissioner a certificate declaring withdrawal under this section.

A person who makes a contribution of the kind described in (a) of this section is liable as a general partner to a third party who transacts business with the enterprise before (1) the person withdraws and an appropriate certificate is filed to show withdrawal, or (2) an appropriate certificate is filed to show that the person is not a general partner, but in either case under (1) or (2) only if the third party actually believed in good faith that the person was a general partner at the time of the transaction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 884 et seq.

Modification or limitation of liability, construction and effect of § 11 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act providing for modification or limitation of liability upon performance of certain acts by one who erroneously believed he had become a limited partner. 18 ALR2d 1360.

Sec. 32.11.140.
Information.

Each limited partner has the right to

inspect and copy the partnership records required to be maintained by AS

32.11.840

; and

obtain from the general partners from time to time upon reasonable demand

true and full information regarding the state of the business and financial condition of the limited partnership;

promptly after it becomes available, a copy of the limited partnership’s federal, state, and local income tax returns for each year; and

other information regarding the affairs of the limited partnership as is just and reasonable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 865.